Hawaii, session 2026, GM1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 36-27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Except as provided in this section, and
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, from time to
time, the director of finance, for the purpose of defraying the
prorated estimate of central service expenses of government in
relation to all special funds, except the:
(1) Special out-of-school time instructional program fund
under section 302A-1310;
(2) School cafeteria special funds of the department of
education;
(3) Special funds of the [Univoraity] university of
Hawaii;
(4) Convention center enterprise special fund under
section 201B-8;
SB LRB 26-0342.docx
■■nMHIlilllHlI

Page 2
S.B. NO.
(5) Special funds [established by] under section 206E-6;
(6) Aloha Tower fund [creatod-by] under section 206J-17;
(7) Funds of the employees' retirement system [creat-ed by]
under section 88-109;
(8) Hawaii hurricane relief fund [e&tabii&hed] under
chapter 431P;
(9) Hawaii health systems corporation special funds and
the subaccounts of its regional system boards;
(10) Universal service fund [cotabliohed] under section
269-42;
(11) Emergency and budget reserve fund under section
328L-3;
(12) Public schools special fees and charges fund under
section 302A-1130;
(13) Sport fish special fund under section 187A-9.5;
(14) Neurotrauma special fund under section 321H-4;
(15) Glass advance disposal fee [cotablished -by] under
section 342G-82;
(16) Center for nursing special fund under section
304A-2163;
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 2

Page 3
S.B. NO. 3ns
(17) Passenger facility charge special fund [catablr-ichcd
under section 261-5.5;
(18) Solicitation of funds for charitable purposes special
fund [eotabliohod by] under section 467B-15;
(19) Land conservation fund [cotabliahcd by] under section
173A-5;
(20) Court interpreting services revolving fund under
section 607-1.5;
(21) Trauma system special fund under section 321-22.5;
(22) Hawaii cancer research special fund;
(23) Community health centers special fund;
(24) Emergency medical services special fund;
(25) Rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special
fund [es-feafeiished] under section 261-5.6;
(26) Shared services technology special fund under section
27-43;
(27) Automated victim information and notification system
special fund [e&feabiirshed] under section 353-136;
(28) Deposit beverage container deposit special fund under
section 342G-104;
SB LRB 26-0342.docx
■iiiBiiiiiiiiiMini

Page 4
S.B. NO.
(29) Hospital sustainability program special fund under
section 346G-4;
(30) Nursing facility sustainability program special fund
under section 346F-4;
(31) Hawaii 3R's school improvement fund under section
302A-1502.4;
(32) After-school plus program revolving fund under section
302A-1149.5;
(33) Civil monetary penalty special fund under section
321-30.2;
(34) Stadium development special fund under section
109-3.5; and
(35) Universal immunization purchase special fund under
section [-E-] 325-133 [+] ,
shall deduct five per cent of all receipts of all other special
funds, which deduction shall be transferred to the general fund
of the State and become general realizations of the State. All
officers of the State and other persons having power to allocate
or disburse any special funds shall cooperate with the director
in effecting these transfers. To determine the proper revenue
base upon which the central service assessment is to be
SB LRB 26-0342.docx

Page 5
S.B. NO.
calculated, the director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
91 for the purpose of suspending or limiting the application of
the central service assessment of any fund. No later than
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session of
the legislature, the director shall report all central service
assessments made during the preceding fiscal year."
SECTION 2. Section 103D-215, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The state procurement automation system special fund
shall be expended by the administrator of the state procurement
office for the purposes of the administration, management,
operation, maintenance, and upgrade of the procurement
automation system."
SECTION 3. Section 132D-16.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t] S132D-16.6 [-3-] Display site inspection. Each county
fire chief is authorized to conduct inspections of the persons
conducting a display, including the site where the display is
occurring or will occur within the fire chief's county to
determine compliance with the applicable county code and the
current editions of the National Fire Protection Association's
SB LRB 26-0342.docx

Page 6
S.B. NO. 3^2-^
"NFPA 1123: Code for Fireworks Display" and "NFPA 1126:
Standard for the Use of Pyrotechnics Before a Proximate
Audience". An inspection fee of $200 shall be assessed by the
county upon the holder of a permit for a display under section
3r^-{-34-r] 132D-10 (a) (2) , which shall be separate from the
display permit fee under that section. The inspection fee shall
be paid to the county in which the display will occur[t] and
shall be used to defray the cost of the official conducting the
inspection of the display setup."
SECTION 4, Section 142-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) In the performance of its duties under this chapter,
the department of agriculture and biosecurity may:
(1) Conduct investigations, collect data, and require
reports from owners of animals, including livestock
animals, as may be necessary to conduct inspections or
facilitate its decisions;
(2) Enter upon private property, including agricultural
lands, as may be necessary in making any investigation
or inspection required or authorized by this chapter;
provided that the entry shall not constitute a cause
SB LRB 26-0342.docx
■Miiiiiiwiniiiiiiiiii

Page 7 S.B. NO. 3^2-5
of action in favor of the owner of the land, except
for damages resulting from wilful acts or negligence
by the department or its employees acting in the
course of their official duties;
Establish and assess fees pursuant to chapter 91 to
cover a portion of the department's costs in carrying
out the implementation and administration of any
programs established or authorized under this chapter;
Recover expenses incurred in taking any action
required by the owner of the animals, including
livestock, in the same manner that debts are
recoverable by law;
(5) Assess and collect administrative penalties for
violation of this chapter, any rule adopted
thereunder, or order issued by the department or board
of agriculture [-f-Jand biosecurity[•)•] pursuant to this
chapter;
Place liens. as needed, on the owner's property. to be
collected as delinquent taxes against lands and
property. if the owner neglects to pay any costs.
expenses, or penalties chargeable to the owner under
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 7
iiiiluinniiiiiii

Page 8 S.B. NO. 3Z2.5
this chapter[—] or any rule, order, or condition
adopted, issued, or required under this chapter;
(7) With the assistance of the attorney general, institute
and pursue all court actions that may be necessary to
obtain the enforcement of any order issued by the
department or board of agriculture [-[-land
biosecurity[+] in carrying out this chapter;
(8) Cooperate, advise, consult, contract, or enter into
cooperative agreements with the United States
government[—] or any of its agencies, other state
agencies, or the county governments [-rl or any of [-arte]
th^^ agencies; and
(9) Take any and all other actions as may be necessary to
carry out this chapter."
SECTION 5. Section 142-3.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§142-3.6 Animal industry special fund. There is
established the animal industry special fund to be administered
by the board of agriculture and biosecurity. Moneys received by
the board of agriculture and biosecurity from:
SB LRB 26-0342.docx
HiguiiiMiiiiniii

Page 9
S.B. NO. 322-5
(1) The use or rental of the division of animal industry's
[proportico] property or facilities, including the
animal quarantine property or facilities pursuant to
section 142-3.5;
(2) Revenue from fees for diagnostic, surveillance, and
other work by the animal industry division veterinary
laboratory and animal disease control branch;
(3) Fines, fees, costs, and damages recovered by the
department of agriculture [-{-] and biosecurity [-3-] under
section 142-32;
(4) Fees for applications to register a brand or mark
pursuant to section 142-41; and
(5) Appropriations or other moneys made available,
shall be deposited into the special fund. Fines collected under
section 708-823.2 shall be deposited into the special fund. All
interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited in the special
fund shall become part of the special fund. Moneys in the
special fund shall be expended to cover costs of the division of
animal industry, including the costs of salaries, fringe
benefits, operating expenses, equipment, motor vehicles,
contracts with any qualified [pcroon] persons or
SB LRB 26-0342.docx
■■■iMiiniM

Page 10
S.B. NO.
[entity] entities for livestock handling services, improvements
to laboratory capabilities and operations, and operating and
maintenance of the animal industry facilities; provided that
moneys in the special fund may be used to fund the department's
resource management and planning programs, A reserve shall be
maintained in the special fund to cover contingency costs,
including accrued vacation leave, unemployment insurance, and
workers' compensation."
SECTION 6. Section 142-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) [9^ie] Subject to section 142-16, the owner of all
cattle reacting to the tuberculin test shall [-;—subjoct -to
GGGtion 142-1-6,] cause them to be segregated immediately and,
within a reasonable time thereafter, to be delivered for
slaughter at a time and place as may be designated by the
department of agriculture and biosecurity. The slaughter shall
be under the direct supervision of the department of agriculture
[-[■land biosecurity[-]-] and in accordance with the meat inspection
regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture."
SECTION 7. Section 142-32, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 10

Page 11
S.B. NO. 5^2-^
1, By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the department
of agriculture [-{-]and biosecurity[+] may set, charge, and
collect administrative fines, fees, and costs for any violation
of this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise provided,
including attorneys' fees and costs, or bring legal action to
recover administrative fines, fees, and costs, including
attorneys' fees and costs, or payment for damages or for the
cost to correct damages resulting from a violation of this
chapter or any rule adopted thereunder."
2. By amending subsections (c) to (f) to read:
" (c) The board of agriculture [-[-land biosecurity[+1 may
impose applicable fines by order in addition to any other
administrative or judicial remedy provided by this chapter or
any rule adopted thereunder.
(d) For any judicial proceeding to recover a fine, fee, or
cost imposed under this section, the chairperson of the board of
agriculture [-[-land biosecurity[4-1 need only show that:
(1) Notice was given and a hearing was held or the time
granted for requesting a hearing has expired without
receiving a request;
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 1
■iiiniHinniii

Page 12
S.B. NO. 32'^^
(2) The fine, fee, or cost was imposed; and
(3) The fine, fee, or cost remains unpaid.
(e) In addition to any other administrative or judicial
remedy provided in this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder,
the department of agriculture [-t-]and biosecurity[-3-] may impound,
seize, confiscate, destroy, quarantine, sell, auction, or
dispose of any animal, animal product, container, crate, or any
other item under the jurisdiction of this chapter in the best
interest of the State.
(f) Any criminal action against a person for any violation
of this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder shall not
preclude the State from pursuing civil legal action to recover
administrative fines, fees, or costs or damages against the
person. Any civil legal action to recover administrative fines,
fees, or costs or damages for a violation of this chapter or any
rule adopted thereunder shall not preclude the State from
pursuing any appropriate criminal action against that person.
Unless otherwise provided, all fines, fees, costs, and damages
recovered by the department of agriculture [-Eland biosecurity[9-]
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the animal
industry special fund established under section 142-3.6.”
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 12

Page 13 S.B. NO. 32ZS
SECTION 8. Section 142-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-[•] S142-51 [-}-] Inspection before slaughter. No person
shall allow livestock to enter a livestock harvesting
establishment that slaughters or processes livestock meat and
meat products unless the establishment's management has
conducted a prior examination and inspection to verify the brand
on animals [ffta-feeh] matches the ownership of the consignee [—]
collects a copy of and confirms the brand with the ownership of
the livestock ownership and movement certificate pursuant to
section 142-49. The establishment's management may seek
assistance from the department of agriculture [-Eland
biosecurity[•}•] or a law enforcement officer if ownership
determination via brand inspection is in question[-rl or
violation or theft is suspected. Livestock ownership and
movement certificates that correlate with all livestock
harvested at the plant shall be submitted weekly by the
establishment's management to the department of agriculture
[-Eland biosecurity [ ] weekly 1 . "
SECTION 9. Section 149A-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 13

Page 14
S.B. NO.
"(a) There shall be an advisory committee on pesticides
composed of but not limited to the chairperson, or the
chairperson's designated representative, who shall head the
committee_^ and one representative each from the department of
health, tl^ department of land and natural resources,
[Univoroity] the university of Hawaii college of tropical
agriculture and human [r-eoourceg, ] resilience, the coffee
industry, the diversified agriculture industry, the Hawaii Farm
Bureau, the pesticide industry, the structural pest control
industry, an environmental organization, a citizen group, and a
landscape professional."
SECTION 10. Section 163D-42, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The working group shall consist of the following
members:
(1) The chairperson of the board of agriculture [-(-]and
biosecurity, or the chairperson's designee, who
shall serve as co-chair;
(2) The director of business, economic development, and
tourism, or the director's designee, who shall serve
as co-chair;
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 14
■HilHIillHHilll

Page 15
S.B. NO.
(3) One member of the house of representatives, to be
selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(4) One member of the senate, to be selected by the
president of the senate; and
(5) Members with relevant experience, to be invited by the
co-chairs."
SECTION 11. Section 201-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§201-81 Establishment of out-of-state offices; purposes.
The department of business, economic development, and tourism
may establish and operate offices and facilities in out-of-state
locations, including foreign nations, to effectuate the
following purposes:
(1) Develop programs to reach targeted companies or
industries in the respective area and surrounding
regions;
(2) Monitor out-of-state government policies and
regulations that have an impact on business, markets,
sales, tourism, and related activities;
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 15

Page 16
S.B. NO. 5
(3) Host government and business officials at conferences,
meetings and social occasions, or other events on
matters pertaining to business opportunities and
attraction of investments for the State;
(4) Develop and conduct advertising efforts, promotional
events, media coverage, and educational programs
regarding commerce in the State;
(5) Conduct related operations as needed, including hiring
or contracting for consultants;
(6) Support sister-state or province [rolatienshipo-,-]
partnerships, as defined in section 229-1, and other
partnerships that promote and enrich the people,
cultures, environments, and economies of the State and
its international partners; and
(7) Generate revenue for the State."
SECTION 12. Section 325-136, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-P] §325-136 I-3-] Immiinity. Apart from liabilities of
assessed entities pursuant to this part, there shall be no
liability on the part of and no cause of action against the
department, its independent contractors, or its employees for
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 1

Page 17
S.B. NO.
any action or omission in the course of operating the universal
immunization [ptH^ehaee] funding program. "
SECTION 13. Section 394-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (h) to read as follows:
"(h) For the purposes of this section:
"Coordinating agency" means the participating [State -ef
Hawaii] state department, agency, or office hosting and
employing an intern program participant.
["Eligible participant'' moano an individual—who mceto
cotabliohed---guidclinos-f or-participation in thc-programT
includ-ing-recent high school graduates,—eeii-ege—atadenfee-;—and
pes-t—ee?ad«ate—s-tedeftfee-;—and individuals seeking-feO' transition
iftte—pubiic—aerviee—eas^eer^s-r]
"Internship program" or "program" means the state
internship and workforce development program established
pursuant to this section.
"Participant" means an individual accepted into the
internship program."
SECTION 14. Section 412:13-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
is amended by amending the definition of "home state" to read as
follows:
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 17
lllln■lnllllillll

Page 18
S.B. NO.
""Home state" has the same meaning in reference to national
banks, state banks, and bank holding companies as is set forth
in section 44 (g) (4) of the Federal Deposit Insurance
Act (12 U.S.C. [1831(u)),] 1831U(g)(4)), and the same meaning in
reference to foreign banks as is set forth in section 5(c) of
the federal International Banking Act (12 U.S.C. 3103(c))."
SECTION 15. Section 514B-154.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows:
" (d) Except as provided under section [-[•] 514B-154.2 [^] ,
any documents, records, and information, whether maintained,
kept, or required to be provided pursuant to this section or
section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, may be made available
electronically to the unit owner or owner's authorized agent if
the owner or owner's authorized agent requests such in writing."
SECTION 16. Section 574-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"S574-3 Children bom to parents not married to each
other. The registrar of births shall register any child born to
parents not married to each other at the time of the child's
birth and where either the natural parents have not married each
other or where the parent-child relationship has not been
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 1

Page 19 S.B. NO. 3^2.5
established pursuant to chapter 584A, as having both a family
name and given name chosen by the individual who gave birth to
the child, unless the child is born to a gestational surrogate
or genetic surrogate pursuant to part IX[—] of chapter 584A, in
which case, the child's name shall be chosen by the intended
parent or parents."
SECTION 17. Section 706-605.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) If a person is convicted of the offense of:
(a) Assault in the first degree, as provided by section
707-710;
(b) Assault in the second degree, as provided by section
707-711 (1) (a), (b), (d), or (n) ;
(c) Assault in the third degree, as provided by section
707-712;
(d) Terroristic threatening in the first degree, as
provided by section [707-716(a) — ] 707-716(1) (a), (e),
or (f); or
(e) Terroristic threatening in the second degree, as
provided by section 707-717; and
SB LRB 26-0342.docx 19

Page 20 S.B. NO. 3Z2.5
the victim of the offense is a sports official engaged in the
lawful discharge of the sports official's duties, the court may
order, in the court's discretion, that the defendant, in
addition to any other punishment imposed pursuant to chapter
706, be enjoined from attending any sports event of the type at
which the sports official was engaged in the lawful discharge of
the sports official's duties for a period of up to twelve months
from the date of sentencing for a first offense, and for life
for a second or subsequent offense."
SECTION 18. This Act does not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that
were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 19. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 20. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY:
SB LRB 26-0342.docx

3225
S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 13th day of April ,2026

S.B. No. 3225
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: March 10, 2026
Honolulu, HawaiT 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: MAR 3 1 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2026.
Clerk, House of Representatives
2891